Washington statutes.
RCW 36.76.100

Notice of election.

The notice of this election shall state which road or roads are to be built or improved. The notice need not describe the road or roads with particularity, but it shall be sufficient either to describe them by termini and with a general statement as to their course, or to use any other appropriate language sufficient to show the purpose intended to be accomplished. The county legislative authority may, at its option, give such other or further notice as it may deem advisable.

[ 1984 c 186 s 32; 1963 c 4 s 36.76.100. Prior: 1913 c 25 s 4; RRS s 5595.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.